Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202526-110
Protection order; term; contents.

(1) A protection order may be issued for an initial period of at least one year and no more than two years, unless dismissed or modified by the court. The length of the initial period shall be set at the court's discretion based upon the evidence presented. When issued, the protection order shall specify its effective initial period.

(2) Any protection order shall specify who is protected by the order and who is subject to restrictions under the order.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 10.